test/src/morphology/A-tulluh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Adjective - tulluh: # Attribute ' / tulluh' - full paradigm
     tulluh+A+Sg+Nom: tulluh
     tulluh+A+Sg+Gen: tulluon
     tulluh+A+Sg+Acc: [tulluh, tulluon]
     tulluh+A+Sg+Par: tulluttu
     tulluh+A+Sg+Tra: tulluokse
     tulluh+A+Sg+Abe: [tulluotta, tulluota, tulluottah]
     tulluh+A+Sg+Com: tulluonke
     tulluh+A+Sg+Ine: tulluos
     tulluh+A+Sg+Ela: [tulluospäi, tulluos]
     tulluh+A+Sg+Ill: tulluoh
     tulluh+A+Sg+Ade: tulluol
     tulluh+A+Sg+Abl: [tulluolpäi, tulluol]
     tulluh+A+Sg+All: tulluole
     tulluh+A+Sg+Ess: tulluonnu
     tulluh+A+Sg+Ter: tulluossah
     tulluh+A+Sg+Apr: tulluolluo
     tulluh+A+Pl+Nom: tulluot
     tulluh+A+Pl+Gen: tulluzien
     tulluh+A+Pl+Acc: tulluot
     tulluh+A+Pl+Par: tulluzii
     tulluh+A+Pl+Tra: tulluzikse
     tulluh+A+Pl+Abe: [tulluzitta, tulluzita, tulluzittah]
     tulluh+A+Pl+Com: tulluzienke
     tulluh+A+Pl+Ine: tulluzis
     tulluh+A+Pl+Ela: [tulluzispäi, tulluzis]
     tulluh+A+Pl+Ill: tulluzih
     tulluh+A+Pl+Ade: tulluzil
     tulluh+A+Pl+Abl: [tulluzilpäi, tulluzil]
     tulluh+A+Pl+All: tulluzile
     tulluh+A+Pl+Ess: tulluzinnu
     tulluh+A+Pl+Ins: tulluzin
     tulluh+A+Pl+Apr: tulluzielluo
     tulluh+A+Sg+Nom+Clt/gi: tulluotgi
     tulluh+A+Sg+Gen+Clt/gi: tulluongi
     tulluh+A+Sg+Acc+Clt/gi: [tulluotgi, tulluongi]
     tulluh+A+Sg+Par+Clt/gi: tulluttugi
     tulluh+A+Sg+Tra+Clt/gi: tulluoksegi
     tulluh+A+Sg+Abe+Clt/gi: [tulluottagi, tulluotagi, tulluottahgi]
     tulluh+A+Sg+Com+Clt/gi: tulluonkegi
     tulluh+A+Sg+Ine+Clt/gi: tulluosgi
     tulluh+A+Sg+Ela+Clt/gi: [tulluospäigi, tulluosgi]
     tulluh+A+Sg+Ill+Clt/gi: tulluohgi
     tulluh+A+Sg+Ade+Clt/gi: tulluolgi
     tulluh+A+Sg+Abl+Clt/gi: [tulluolpäigi, tulluolgi]
     tulluh+A+Sg+All+Clt/gi: tulluolegi
     tulluh+A+Sg+Ess+Clt/gi: tulluonnugi
     tulluh+A+Sg+Ter+Clt/gi: tulluossahgi
     tulluh+A+Sg+Apr+Clt/gi: tulluolluogi
     tulluh+A+Pl+Nom+Clt/gi: tulluotgi
     tulluh+A+Pl+Gen+Clt/gi: tulluziengi
     tulluh+A+Pl+Acc+Clt/gi: tulluotgi
     tulluh+A+Pl+Par+Clt/gi: tulluziigi
     tulluh+A+Pl+Tra+Clt/gi: tulluziksegi
     tulluh+A+Pl+Abe+Clt/gi: [tulluzittagi, tulluzitagi, tulluzittahgi]
     tulluh+A+Pl+Com+Clt/gi: tulluzienkegi
     tulluh+A+Pl+Ine+Clt/gi: tulluzisgi
     tulluh+A+Pl+Ela+Clt/gi: [tulluzispäigi, tulluzisgi]
     tulluh+A+Pl+Ill+Clt/gi: tulluzihgi
     tulluh+A+Pl+Ade+Clt/gi: tulluzilgi
     tulluh+A+Pl+Abl+Clt/gi: [tulluzilpäigi, tulluzilgi]
     tulluh+A+Pl+All+Clt/gi: tulluzilegi
     tulluh+A+Pl+Ess+Clt/gi: tulluzinnugi
     tulluh+A+Pl+Ins+Clt/gi: tulluzingi
     tulluh+A+Pl+Apr+Clt/gi: tulluzielluogi
